New York, session 2025-2026, A1840.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 34-a of section 1.20 of the 2 criminal procedure law, as amended by chapter 428 of the laws of 1999, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) [Except as provided in paragraph (d) of this subdivision,] New 5 York state constitutes the "geographical area of employment" of any 6 police officer employed as such by an agency of the state or by an 7 authority which functions throughout the state, or a police officer 8 designated by the superintendent of state police pursuant to section two 9 hundred twenty-three of the executive law; 10 § 2. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 34-a of section 1.20 of the criminal 11 procedure law, as amended by chapter 424 of the laws of 1998, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 (a) [Except as provided in paragraph (d),] New York state constitutes 14 the "geographical area of employment" of any police officer employed as 15 such by an agency of the state or by an authority which functions 16 throughout the state; 17 § 3. Paragraph (d) of subdivision 34-a of section 1.20 of the criminal 18 procedure law is REPEALED. 19 § 4. Paragraph l of subdivision 2 of section 355 of the education law, 20 as amended by chapter 424 of the laws of 1998, is amended to read as 21 follows: 22 l. To appoint university police officers who shall have the powers of 23 police officers and to remove such police officers at pleasure; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00777-01-5 A. 1840 2 1 provided, however, that any person appointed a police officer must have 2 satisfactorily completed or complete within one year of the date of 3 [his] appointment a course of law enforcement training approved by the 4 municipal police training council in consultation with the university. 5 [It shall be the duty of such police officers to preserve law and order 6 on the campuses and other property of the university, including any 7 portion of a public highway which crosses or abuts such property.] 8 Subject to the approval of the chancellor, the president of each 9 state-operated campus of the state university [shall] may enter into a 10 written agreement with adjoining law enforcement agencies establishing 11 protocols for the exercise of authority by such university police offi- 12 cer off-campus, including mutual aid and assistance. Such written proto- 13 cols shall not be deemed to supersede the authority of other police 14 officers. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to any of 15 the state institutions and property referred to in section five thousand 16 seven hundred nine of this chapter. 17 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 18 the amendments to paragraph (a) of subdivision 34-a of section 1.20 of 19 the criminal procedure law made by section one of this act shall be 20 subject to the expiration and reversion of such paragraph pursuant to 21 section 3 of chapter 428 of the laws of 1999, as amended, when upon such 22 date the provisions of section two of this act shall take effect.